Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 9. Time

§ 431.
Standard time; daylight saving time.

The standard time within the State of Vermont shall be based on the mean astronomical time of 75° of longitude west from Greenwich, known and designated as “U.S. Eastern Standard Time,” except as provided in

15 U.S.C. § 260a

, when standard time shall be advanced one hour. The period of time so advanced may be called “daylight saving time.”

The Governor is authorized to shorten or lengthen the period specified in subsection (a) of this section by proclamation, if necessary to make the time accord with the time in effect in any of the states whose boundaries adjoin Vermont. This proclamation shall be issued at least 10 days before it takes effect.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 74

, § 1.

§ 432.
Use as to laws and contracts.

In all laws, statutes, orders, decrees, rules, and regulations relating to the time of performance of any act by any officer or department of this State, including the Legislative, Executive, and Judicial Branches of the State government, or of any county, city, town, or district thereof, or relating to the time in which any rights shall accrue or determine, or within which any act shall or shall not be performed by any person subject to the jurisdiction of this State and in all the public schools and institutions of the State, or of any county, city, town, or district thereof, and in all contracts or choses in action made or to be performed in this State, it shall be understood and intended that the time shall be the time designated in section 431 of this title.